sl-SI: Velikost izbirnika prstov: Prilagodljivo; Zelo velika (XL); Zelo majhna (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Univerzalna velikost; Majhna (S); Drugo
en: Finger pick size: Adjustable; Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Other
tr: Parmak penası boyutu: Ayarlanabilir; Ekstra büyük (XL); Ekstra küçük (XS); Büyük (L); Orta (M); Tek beden; Küçük (S); Diğer
ru: Размер пальцевого медиатора: Регулируемый; Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (M); Единый размер; Маленький (S); Другое
nl: Vingerplectrum maat: Verstelbaar; Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Overige
hr-HR: Veličina trzalice: Prilagodljiva; Iznimno velika (XL); Iznimno mala (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Univerzalna veličina; Mala (S); Ostalo
th: ขนาดนิ้วจิ้ม: ปรับได้; ใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); เล็กพิเศษ (XS); ใหญ่ (L); กลาง (M); ขนาดเดียว; เล็ก (S); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tamanho da palheta: Ajustável; Extragrande (GG); Extrapequeno (PP); Grande (G); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (P); Outros
ja: 指ピックサイズ: 調節可能; エクストララージ (XL); エクストラスモール (XS); ラージ (L); ミディアム (M); ワンサイズ; スモール (S); その他
da: Fingerplekterstørrelse: Justerbar; Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra lille (XS); Stor (L); Medium (M); One size; Lille (S); Andet
it: Finger pick v: Regolabile; Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Taglia unica; Small (S); Altro
bg-BG: Размер на перцето за пръст: Регулируем; Много голям (XL); Много малък (XS); Голям (L); Среден (M); Един размер; Малък (S); Други
de: Größe des Fingerpicks: Verstellbar; Extragroß (XL); Extraklein (XS); Groß (L); Mittel (M); Einheitsgröße; Klein (S); Sonstige
lt-LT: Pirštinio mediatoriaus dydis: Reguliuojamas; Labai didelis (XL); Labai mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Vieno dydžio; Mažas (S); Kita
pt-PT: tamanho da palheta: Ajustável; Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (S); Outro
sk-SK: Veľkosť prstového brnkátka: Nastaviteľná; Extra veľká (XL); Extra malá (XS); Veľká (L); Stredná (M); Jedna veľkosť; Malá (S); Iné
zh-TW: 指套撥片尺寸: 可調式; 特大 (XL); 特小 (XS); 大 (L); 中 (M); 單一尺寸; 小 (S); 其他
zh-CN: 指拨尺寸: 可调节; 加大码 (XL); 加小码 (XS); 大码 (L); 中码 (M); 均码; 小码 (S); 其他
el: Μέγεθος finger pick: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Πολύ μεγάλο (XL); Πολύ μικρό (XS); Μεγάλο (L); Μεσαίο (M); Ένα μέγεθος; Μικρό (S); Άλλο
fi: Sormiplektran koko: Säädettävä; Erittäin suuri (XL); Erittäin pieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikokoinen (M); Yksi koko; Pieni (S); Muu
ro-RO: Dimensiunea penei de deget: Ajustabil; Foarte mare (XL); Foarte mic (XS); Mare (L); Mediu (M); Mărime universală; Mic (S); Altele
sv: Fingerplockarstorlek: Justerbar; Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Övrigt
pl: Rozmiar kostki palcowej: Regulowane; Bardzo duże (XL); Bardzo małe (XS); Duże (L); Średnie (M); Rozmiar uniwersalny; Małe (S); Inny
nb: Størrelse på fingerplukker: Justerbar; Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Medium (M); One size; Liten (S); Annet
vi: Kích thước miếng gảy ngón tay: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cực lớn (XL); Cực nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Một cỡ; Nhỏ (S); Khác
hu: Ujjpengető mérete: Állítható; Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Egyméretes; Kicsi (S); Egyéb
ko: 핑거 픽 사이즈: 조절 가능; 엑스트라 라지(XL); 엑스트라 스몰(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 원사이즈; 스몰(S); 기타
cs: Velikost trsátka: Nastavitelné; Extra velké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Univerzální velikost; Malé (S); Jiné
es: Tamaño de púa para dedo: Ajustable; Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeño (XS); Grande (L); Mediano (M); Talla única; Pequeño (S); Otro
fr: Taille de l’onglet: Réglable; Très grand (XL); Très petit (XS); Grand (L); Moyen (M); Taille unique; Petit (S); Autre